Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska11-118
Bonds; successive terms; sureties; qualification.

No person shall be surety for the same officer for more than two successive terms of the same office; but this provision shall not apply to incorporated surety companies.

Laws 1881, c. 13, § 18, p. 98;

Laws 1905, c. 11, § 1, p. 64;

R.S.1913, § 5724;

C.S.1922, § 5054;

C.S.1929, § 12-118;

R.S.1943, § 11-118.

Elected county officials are required to give individual official bonds. Blanket bond is not sufficient. Foote v. County of Adams, 163 Neb. 406, 80 N.W.2d 179 (1956).